src/noun-myv-morph.txt
LEXICON kal-N-Poss-Declension-CX-SG
+Nom+Sg+Px1Sg:%>О1м kal-NomSg-Conjugation ;
+Nom+Sg+Px2Sg+Use/Sub/Dial:%>О1тЬ2 kit-NomSg-Conjugation ;
+Nom+Sg+Px3Sg:%>О1зО1 kudo-NomSg-Conjugation ;
+Nom+Sg+Px3Pl+Use/Sub/Dial:%>О1мО1к lak-NomSg-Conjugation ;
+Gen+Sg+Px1Sg:%>О1м kal-Conjugation ;
+Gen+Sg+Px3Sg+Inanim+Use/Sub/Dial:%>О1зО1 kudo-Conjugation ;

 kal-N-Poss-Declension-CX-NbAmb ;

LEXICON kal-N-Poss-Declension-CX-PL
+Nom+Pl+Px1Sg:%>О1нЬ2 kal-NomPl-Conjugation ;
+Nom+Pl+Px1Sg:%>О1нЬ2 Clitic ;
+Nom+Pl+Px2Sg+Use/Sub/Dial:%>О1нтЬ2 kit-NomPl-Conjugation ;
+Nom+Pl+Px2Sg+Use/Sub/Dial:%>О1нтЬ2 Clitic ;
+Nom+Pl+Px3Sg:%>О1нзО1 kudo-NomPl-Conjugation ;
+Gen+Pl+Px1Sg:%>О1нЬ2 kal-Conjugation ;
 kal-N-Poss-Declension-CX-NbAmb ;

LEXICON kal-N-Poss-Declension-CX-NbAmb
+Nom+Sg+Px1Sg+Use/Sub/Dial:%>О1м kal-NomSg-Conjugation ;
+Nom+Sg+Px2Sg:%>О1тЬ2 kit-NomSg-Conjugation ;
+Nom+Sg+Px3Pl:%>О1нО1к lak-NomSg-Conjugation ;
+Nom+Pl+Px3Pl:%>О1нО1к lak-NomPl-Conjugation ;
+Nom+Sg+Px2Pl:%>О1нк lak-NomSg-Conjugation ;
+Nom+Pl+Px2Pl:%>О1нк lak-NomPl-Conjugation ;
+Nom+Pl+Px3Pl:%>О1ст kit-NomPl-Conjugation ;
+Gen+Sg+Px1Sg+Use/Sub/Dial:%>О1м kal-Conjugation ;
+Gen+Pl+Px1Sg+Use/Sub/Dial:%>О1м kal-Conjugation ;
+Gen+Sg+Px2Sg:%>О1тЬ2 kit-Conjugation ;
+Gen+Pl+Px2Sg:%>О1тЬ2 kit-Conjugation ;
+Gen+Sg+Px2Sg+Use/Sub/Dial:%>О1нтЬ2 kit-Conjugation ;
+Gen+Pl+Px2Sg+Use/Sub/Dial:%>О1нтЬ2 kit-Conjugation ;
+Gen+Sg+Px3Sg:%>О1нзО1 kudo-Conjugation ;
+Gen+Pl+Px3Sg:%>О1нзО1 kudo-Conjugation ;
+Dat+Sg+Px3:%>О1нстэнь kudo-Conjugation ;
+Dat+Pl+Px3:%>О1нстэнь kudo-Conjugation ;
+Gen+Sg+Px3Pl:%>О1нО1к lak-Conjugation ;
+Gen+Pl+Px3Pl:%>О1нО1к lak-Conjugation ;
+Gen+Sg+Px2Pl:%>О1нк lak-Conjugation ;
+Gen+Pl+Px2Pl:%>О1нк lak-Conjugation ;
+Gen+Sg+Px3Pl:%>О1ст kit-Conjugation ;
+Gen+Pl+Px3Pl:%>О1ст kit-Conjugation ;
+Abl+Sg:%>дО1 kudo-N-Poss-Declension-PossX ;
+Abl+Pl:%>дО1 kudo-N-Poss-Declension-PossX ;
+Ela+Sg:%>стО1 kudo-N-Poss-Declension-PossX ;
+Ela+Pl:%>стО1 kudo-N-Poss-Declension-PossX ;
+Ine+Sg:%>сО1 kudo-N-Poss-Declension-PossX ;
+Ine+Pl:%>сО1 kudo-N-Poss-Declension-PossX ;
+Prl+Sg:%>Г2а kudo-N-Poss-Declension-PossX ;
+Prl+Pl:%>Г2а kudo-N-Poss-Declension-PossX ;
+Comp+Sg:%>О1шка kudo-N-Poss-Declension-PossX ;
+Comp+Pl:%>О1шка kudo-N-Poss-Declension-PossX ;
+Abe+Sg:%>втО1мО1 kudo-N-Poss-Declension-PossX ;
+Abe+Pl:%>втО1мО1 kudo-N-Poss-Declension-PossX ;
+Tra+Sg:%>О1кс osh-N-Poss-Declension-PossX ;
+Tra+Pl:%>О1кс osh-N-Poss-Declension-PossX ;
+Ill+Sg:%>О1з osh-N-Poss-Declension-PossX ;
+Ill+Pl:%>О1з osh-N-Poss-Declension-PossX ;

LEXICON kit-N-Poss-Declension-CX
kit-N-Poss-Declension-CX-SG ;
kit-N-Poss-Declension-CX-PL ;
kit-N-Poss-Declension-CX-NbAmb ;

LEXICON kit-N-Poss-Declension-CX-SG
+Nom+Sg+Px1Sg:%>О1м kal-NomSg-Conjugation ;
+Nom+Sg+Px2Sg+Use/Sub/Dial:%>О1тЬ2 kit-NomSg-Conjugation ;
+Nom+Sg+Px3Sg:%>О1зО1 kudo-NomSg-Conjugation ;
+Nom+Sg+Px3Pl+Use/Sub/Dial:%>О1мО1к lak-NomSg-Conjugation ;
+Gen+Sg+Px1Sg:%>О1м kal-Conjugation ;
+Gen+Sg+Px3Sg+Inanim+Use/Sub/Dial:%>О1зО1 kudo-Conjugation ;

 kit-N-Poss-Declension-CX-NbAmb ;


LEXICON kit-N-Poss-Declension-CX-PL
+Nom+Pl+Px1Sg:%>О1нЬ2 kal-NomPl-Conjugation ;
+Nom+Pl+Px1Sg:%>О1нЬ2 Clitic ;
+Nom+Pl+Px2Sg+Use/Sub/Dial:%>О1нтЬ2 kit-NomPl-Conjugation ;
+Nom+Pl+Px2Sg+Use/Sub/Dial:%>О1нтЬ2 Clitic ;
+Nom+Pl+Px3Sg:%>О1нзО1 kudo-NomPl-Conjugation ;
+Gen+Pl+Px1Sg:%>О1нЬ2 kal-Conjugation ;

 kit-N-Poss-Declension-CX-NbAmb ;

LEXICON kit-N-Poss-Declension-CX-NbAmb
+Nom+Sg+Px1Sg+Use/Sub/Dial:%>О1м kal-NomSg-Conjugation ;
+Nom+Sg+Px2Sg:%>О1тЬ2 kit-NomSg-Conjugation ;
+Nom+Sg+Px3Pl:%>О1нО1к lak-NomSg-Conjugation ;
+Nom+Pl+Px3Pl:%>О1нО1к lak-NomPl-Conjugation ;
+Nom+Sg+Px2Pl:%>О1нк lak-NomSg-Conjugation ;
+Nom+Pl+Px2Pl:%>О1нк lak-NomPl-Conjugation ;
+Nom+Pl+Px3Pl:%>О1ст kit-NomPl-Conjugation ;
+Gen+Sg+Px1Sg+Use/Sub/Dial:%>О1м kal-Conjugation ;
+Gen+Pl+Px1Sg+Use/Sub/Dial:%>О1м kal-Conjugation ;
+Gen+Sg+Px2Sg:%>О1тЬ2 kit-Conjugation ;
+Gen+Pl+Px2Sg:%>О1тЬ2 kit-Conjugation ;
+Gen+Sg+Px2Sg+Use/Sub/Dial:%>О1нтЬ2 kit-Conjugation ;
+Gen+Pl+Px2Sg+Use/Sub/Dial:%>О1нтЬ2 kit-Conjugation ;
+Gen+Sg+Px3Sg:%>О1нзО1 kudo-Conjugation ;
+Gen+Pl+Px3Sg:%>О1нзО1 kudo-Conjugation ;
+Dat+Sg+Px3:%>О1нстэнь kudo-Conjugation ;
+Dat+Pl+Px3:%>О1нстэнь kudo-Conjugation ;
+Gen+Sg+Px3Pl:%>О1нО1к lak-Conjugation ;
+Gen+Pl+Px3Pl:%>О1нО1к lak-Conjugation ;
+Gen+Sg+Px2Pl:%>О1нк lak-Conjugation ;
+Gen+Pl+Px2Pl:%>О1нк lak-Conjugation ;
+Gen+Sg+Px3Pl:%>О1ст kit-Conjugation ;
+Gen+Pl+Px3Pl:%>О1ст kit-Conjugation ;
+Abl+Sg:%>дО1 kudo-N-Poss-Declension-PossX ;
+Abl+Pl:%>дО1 kudo-N-Poss-Declension-PossX ;
+Ela+Sg:%>стО1 kudo-N-Poss-Declension-PossX ;
+Ela+Pl:%>стО1 kudo-N-Poss-Declension-PossX ;
+Ine+Sg:%>сО1 kudo-N-Poss-Declension-PossX ;
+Ine+Pl:%>сО1 kudo-N-Poss-Declension-PossX ;
+Prl+Sg:%>Г2а kudo-N-Poss-Declension-PossX ;
+Prl+Pl:%>Г2а kudo-N-Poss-Declension-PossX ;
+Comp+Sg:%>О1шка kudo-N-Poss-Declension-PossX ;
+Comp+Pl:%>О1шка kudo-N-Poss-Declension-PossX ;
+Abe+Sg:%>втО1мО1 kudo-N-Poss-Declension-PossX ;
+Abe+Pl:%>втО1мО1 kudo-N-Poss-Declension-PossX ;
+Tra+Sg:%>О1кс osh-N-Poss-Declension-PossX ;
+Tra+Pl:%>О1кс osh-N-Poss-Declension-PossX ;
+Ill+Sg:%>О1з osh-N-Poss-Declension-PossX ;
+Ill+Pl:%>О1з osh-N-Poss-Declension-PossX ;

LEXICON lak-N-Poss-Declension-CX
kit-N-Poss-Declension-CX-SG ;
kit-N-Poss-Declension-CX-PL ;
kit-N-Poss-Declension-CX-NbAmb ;

LEXICON lak-N-Poss-Declension-CX-SG
+Nom+Sg+Px1Sg:%>О1м kal-NomSg-Conjugation ;
+Nom+Sg+Px2Sg+Use/Sub/Dial:%>О1тЬ2 kit-NomSg-Conjugation ;
+Nom+Sg+Px3Sg:%>О1зО1 kudo-NomSg-Conjugation ;
+Nom+Sg+Px3Pl+Use/Sub/Dial:%>О1мО1к lak-NomSg-Conjugation ;
+Gen+Sg+Px1Sg:%>О1м kal-Conjugation ;
+Gen+Sg+Px3Sg+Inanim+Use/Sub/Dial:%>О1зО1 kudo-Conjugation ;

 lak-N-Poss-Declension-CX-NbAmb ;


LEXICON lak-N-Poss-Declension-CX-PL
+Nom+Pl+Px1Sg:%>О1нЬ2 kal-NomPl-Conjugation ;
+Nom+Pl+Px1Sg:%>О1нЬ2 Clitic ;
+Nom+Pl+Px2Sg+Use/Sub/Dial:%>О1нтЬ2 kit-NomPl-Conjugation ;
+Nom+Pl+Px2Sg+Use/Sub/Dial:%>О1нтЬ2 Clitic ;
+Nom+Pl+Px3Sg:%>О1нзО1 kudo-NomPl-Conjugation ;
+Gen+Pl+Px1Sg:%>О1нЬ2 kal-Conjugation ;

 lak-N-Poss-Declension-CX-NbAmb ;

LEXICON lak-N-Poss-Declension-CX-NbAmb
+Nom+Sg+Px1Sg+Use/Sub/Dial:%>О1м kal-NomSg-Conjugation ;
+Nom+Sg+Px2Sg:%>О1тЬ2 kit-NomSg-Conjugation ;
+Nom+Sg+Px3Pl:%>О1нО1к lak-NomSg-Conjugation ;
+Nom+Pl+Px3Pl:%>О1нО1к lak-NomPl-Conjugation ;
+Nom+Sg+Px2Pl:%>О1нк lak-NomSg-Conjugation ;
+Nom+Pl+Px2Pl:%>О1нк lak-NomPl-Conjugation ;
+Nom+Pl+Px3Pl:%>О1ст kit-NomPl-Conjugation ;
+Gen+Sg+Px1Sg+Use/Sub/Dial:%>О1м kal-Conjugation ;
+Gen+Pl+Px1Sg+Use/Sub/Dial:%>О1м kal-Conjugation ;
+Gen+Sg+Px2Sg:%>О1тЬ2 kit-Conjugation ;
+Gen+Pl+Px2Sg:%>О1тЬ2 kit-Conjugation ;
+Gen+Sg+Px2Sg+Use/Sub/Dial:%>О1нтЬ2 kit-Conjugation ;
+Gen+Pl+Px2Sg+Use/Sub/Dial:%>О1нтЬ2 kit-Conjugation ;
+Gen+Sg+Px3Sg:%>О1нзО1 kudo-Conjugation ;
+Gen+Pl+Px3Sg:%>О1нзО1 kudo-Conjugation ;
+Dat+Sg+Px3:%>О1нстэнь kudo-Conjugation ;
+Dat+Pl+Px3:%>О1нстэнь kudo-Conjugation ;
+Gen+Sg+Px3Pl:%>О1нО1к lak-Conjugation ;
+Gen+Pl+Px3Pl:%>О1нО1к lak-Conjugation ;
+Gen+Sg+Px2Pl:%>О1нк lak-Conjugation ;
+Gen+Pl+Px2Pl:%>О1нк lak-Conjugation ;
+Gen+Sg+Px3Pl:%>О1ст kit-Conjugation ;
+Gen+Pl+Px3Pl:%>О1ст kit-Conjugation ;
+Abl+Sg:%>дО1 kudo-N-Poss-Declension-PossX ;
+Abl+Pl:%>дО1 kudo-N-Poss-Declension-PossX ;
+Ela+Sg:%>стО1 kudo-N-Poss-Declension-PossX ;
+Ela+Pl:%>стО1 kudo-N-Poss-Declension-PossX ;
+Ine+Sg:%>сО1 kudo-N-Poss-Declension-PossX ;
+Ine+Pl:%>сО1 kudo-N-Poss-Declension-PossX ;
+Prl+Sg:%>Г2а kudo-N-Poss-Declension-PossX ;
+Prl+Pl:%>Г2а kudo-N-Poss-Declension-PossX ;
+Comp+Sg:%>О1шка kudo-N-Poss-Declension-PossX ;
+Comp+Pl:%>О1шка kudo-N-Poss-Declension-PossX ;
+Abe+Sg:%>втО1мО1 kudo-N-Poss-Declension-PossX ;
+Abe+Pl:%>втО1мО1 kudo-N-Poss-Declension-PossX ;
+Tra+Sg:%>О1кс osh-N-Poss-Declension-PossX ;
+Tra+Pl:%>О1кс osh-N-Poss-Declension-PossX ;
+Ill+Sg:%>О1з osh-N-Poss-Declension-PossX ;
+Ill+Pl:%>О1з osh-N-Poss-Declension-PossX ;

LEXICON osh-N-Poss-Declension-CX
osh-N-Poss-Declension-CX-SG ;
osh-N-Poss-Declension-CX-PL ;
osh-N-Poss-Declension-CX-NbAmb ;

LEXICON osh-N-Poss-Declension-CX-SG
 kal-N-Poss-Declension-CX-SG ;
 osh-N-Poss-Declension-CX-NbAmb ;


LEXICON osh-N-Poss-Declension-CX-PL
 kal-N-Poss-Declension-CX-PL ;
 osh-N-Poss-Declension-CX-NbAmb ;

LEXICON osh-N-Poss-Declension-CX-NbAmb
 kal-N-Poss-Declension-CX-NbAmb ;
+LV+Ela+Sg:%>О1стО1 kudo-N-Poss-Declension-PossX ;
+LV+Ela+Pl:%>О1стО1 kudo-N-Poss-Declension-PossX ;
+LV+Ine+Sg:%>О1сО1 kudo-N-Poss-Declension-PossX ;
+LV+Ine+Pl:%>О1сО1 kudo-N-Poss-Declension-PossX ;

LEXICON pango-N-Poss-Declension-CX
 pango-N-Poss-Declension-CX-SG ;
 pango-N-Poss-Declension-CX-PL ;
 pango-N-Poss-Declension-CX-NbAmb ;

LEXICON pango-N-Poss-Declension-CX-SG
+Nom+Sg+Px1Sg:%>м kal-NomSg-Conjugation ;
+Gen+Sg+Px1Sg:%>м kal-Conjugation ;
+Nom+Sg+Px2Sg+Use/Sub/Dial:%>тЬ2 kit-NomSg-Conjugation ;
+Nom+Sg+Px3Sg:%>зО1 kudo-NomSg-Conjugation ;
+Gen+Sg+Px3Sg+Inanim+Use/Sub/Dial:%>зО1 kudo-Conjugation ;
+Nom+Sg+Px3Pl+Use/Sub/Dial:%>мО1к lak-NomSg-Conjugation ;
 kudo-N-Poss-Declension-CX-NbAmb ;

LEXICON pango-N-Poss-Declension-CX-PL
+Nom+Pl+Px1Sg:%>нЬ2 kal-NomPl-Conjugation ;
+Nom+Pl+Px1Sg:%>нЬ2 Clitic ;
+Gen+Pl+Px1Sg:%>нЬ2 kal-Conjugation ;
+Nom+Pl+Px2Sg+Use/Sub/Dial:%>нтЬ2 kit-NomPl-Conjugation ;
+Nom+Pl+Px2Sg+Use/Sub/Dial:%>нтЬ2 Clitic ;
+Nom+Pl+Px3Sg:%>нзО1 kudo-NomPl-Conjugation ;

LEXICON pango-N-Poss-Declension-CX-NbAmb
+Nom+Sg+Px1Sg+Use/Sub/Dial:%>м kal-NomSg-Conjugation ;
+Gen+Sg+Px1Sg+Use/Sub/Dial:%>м kal-Conjugation ;
+Gen+Pl+Px1Sg+Use/Sub/Dial:%>м kal-Conjugation ;
+Nom+Sg+Px2Sg:%>тЬ2 kit-NomSg-Conjugation ;
+Gen+Sg+Px2Sg:%>тЬ2 kit-Conjugation ;
+Gen+Pl+Px2Sg:%>тЬ2 kit-Conjugation ;
+Gen+Sg+Px2Sg+Use/Sub/Dial:%>нтЬ2 kit-Conjugation ;
+Gen+Pl+Px2Sg+Use/Sub/Dial:%>нтЬ2 kit-Conjugation ;
+Gen+Sg+Px3Sg:%>нзО1 kudo-Conjugation ;
+Gen+Pl+Px3Sg:%>нзО1 kudo-Conjugation ;
+Dat+Sg+Px3:%>нстэнь kudo-Conjugation ;
+Dat+Pl+Px3:%>нстэнь kudo-Conjugation ;
+Nom+Sg+Px3Pl:%>нО1к lak-NomSg-Conjugation ;
+Nom+Pl+Px3Pl:%>нО1к lak-NomPl-Conjugation ;
+Gen+Sg+Px3Pl:%>нО1к lak-Conjugation ;
+Gen+Pl+Px3Pl:%>нО1к lak-Conjugation ;
+Nom+Sg+Px2Pl:%>нк lak-NomSg-Conjugation ;
+Nom+Pl+Px2Pl:%>нк lak-NomPl-Conjugation ;
+Gen+Sg+Px2Pl:%>нк lak-Conjugation ;
+Gen+Pl+Px2Pl:%>нк lak-Conjugation ;
+Nom+Pl+Px3Pl:%>ст kit-NomPl-Conjugation ;
+Gen+Sg+Px3Pl:%>ст kit-Conjugation ;
+Gen+Pl+Px3Pl:%>ст kit-Conjugation ;
+Comp+Sg:%>шка kudo-N-Poss-Declension-PossX ;
+Comp+Pl:%>шка kudo-N-Poss-Declension-PossX ;
+Abe+Sg:%>втО1мО1 kudo-N-Poss-Declension-PossX ;
+Abe+Pl:%>втО1мО1 kudo-N-Poss-Declension-PossX ;
+Tra+Sg:%>кс osh-N-Poss-Declension-PossX ;
+Tra+Pl:%>кс osh-N-Poss-Declension-PossX ;
+Ill+Sg:%>з osh-N-Poss-Declension-PossX ;
+Ill+Pl:%>з osh-N-Poss-Declension-PossX ;
+Abl+Sg:%>дО1 kudo-N-Poss-Declension-PossX ;
+Abl+Pl:%>дО1 kudo-N-Poss-Declension-PossX ;
+Ela+Sg:%>стО1 kudo-N-Poss-Declension-PossX ;
+Ela+Pl:%>стО1 kudo-N-Poss-Declension-PossX ;
+Ine+Sg:%>сО1 kudo-N-Poss-Declension-PossX ;
+Ine+Pl:%>сО1 kudo-N-Poss-Declension-PossX ;
+Prl+Sg:%>Г2а kudo-N-Poss-Declension-PossX ;
+Prl+Pl:%>Г2а kudo-N-Poss-Declension-PossX ;
+VLoss+Abl+Sg:%>VLossдО1 kudo-N-Poss-Declension-PossX ;
+VLoss+Abl+Pl:%>VLossдО1 kudo-N-Poss-Declension-PossX ;
+VLoss+Ela+Sg:%>VLossстО1 kudo-N-Poss-Declension-PossX ;
+VLoss+Ela+Pl:%>VLossстО1 kudo-N-Poss-Declension-PossX ;
+VLoss+Ine+Sg:%>VLossсО1 kudo-N-Poss-Declension-PossX ;
+VLoss+Ine+Pl:%>VLossсО1 kudo-N-Poss-Declension-PossX ;

LEXICON kudo-N-Poss-Declension-CX
 kudo-N-Poss-Declension-CX-SG ;
 kudo-N-Poss-Declension-CX-PL ;
 kudo-N-Poss-Declension-CX-NbAmb ;

LEXICON kudo-N-Poss-Declension-CX-SG
+Nom+Sg+Px1Sg:%>м kal-NomSg-Conjugation ;
+Gen+Sg+Px1Sg:%>м kal-Conjugation ;
+Nom+Sg+Px2Sg+Use/Sub/Dial:%>тЬ2 kit-NomSg-Conjugation ;
+Nom+Sg+Px3Sg:%>зО1 kudo-NomSg-Conjugation ;
+Gen+Sg+Px3Sg+Inanim+Use/Sub/Dial:%>зО1 kudo-Conjugation ;
+Nom+Sg+Px3Pl+Use/Sub/Dial:%>мО1к lak-NomSg-Conjugation ;
 kudo-N-Poss-Declension-CX-NbAmb ;
